Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,102.02
Department; testing of water and agricultural products.

(1) The department shall offer to landowners directly adjacent to the facility's boundary an annual well and surface water sampling and analysis of any domestic water supply at no cost to the landowner.

(2) The department shall offer to landowners directly adjacent to the facility's boundary the opportunity for testing of agricultural products produced on the property for contamination by radioactivity. The testing shall be conducted pursuant to a plan developed by the department and at no cost to the landowner.

Laws 1989, LB 761, § 16.